Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3607
City or village; proposed boundaries; file map.

Within forty-five days after the receipt of the notice provided for in section 23-3606, each city or village shall file with the county clerk a map clearly delineating the proposed boundaries of the area of future growth and development of the city or village within the county as developed and approved by the governing body of the city or village.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 7.